District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

5-129.21

Security Officer Advisory Commission.

Repealed.

History

Nov. 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-187, § 101, 53 DCR 6722
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 253, 62 DCR 1884

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 253 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 253 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).